Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska44-923
Unfair trade practice.

In addition to any other remedies available under the laws of this state, each violation of the Privacy of Insurance Consumer Information Act and any rules and regulations adopted and promulgated under the act shall be an unfair trade practice in the business of insurance subject to the Unfair Insurance Trade Practices Act.

Laws 2001, LB 52, § 23.

Unfair Insurance Trade Practices Act, see section 44-1521.